test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_CW_jooweshk_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefjooweshk+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ijooweshkiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefjooweshk+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ijooweshkiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ijooweshkiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefjooweshk+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ijooweshkiniibanan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ijooweshkiniibanag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ijooweshkiniibaning
     +PxIndefjooweshk+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ijooweshkini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefjooweshk+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ijooweshkini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ijooweshkini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: jooweshkensimishinaan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: jooweshkensimishiwaa
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: jooweshkensimishini
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: jooweshkenhimishinaan
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: jooweshkenhimishiwaa
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: jooweshkenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: jooweshkensimishiban
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: jooweshkensimish***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: jooweshkenhimishiban
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: jooweshkenhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 7
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: jooweshkensimishan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: jooweshkensimishag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: jooweshkensimishing
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: jooweshkenhimishan
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: jooweshkenhimishag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: jooweshkenhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: jooweshkensiminaaniban
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: jooweshkensiminaan***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: jooweshkensimiwaaiban
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: jooweshkensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: jooweshkensiminiiban
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: jooweshkensimini***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: jooweshkenhiminaaniban
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: jooweshkenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: jooweshkenhimiwaaiban
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: jooweshkenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: jooweshkenhiminiiban
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: jooweshkenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: jooweshkensiminaanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: jooweshkensiminaanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: jooweshkensiminaaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: jooweshkensimiwaaan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: jooweshkensimiwaaag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: jooweshkensimiwaaing
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: jooweshkensiminian
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: jooweshkensiminiag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: jooweshkensiminiing
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: jooweshkenhiminaanan
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: jooweshkenhiminaanag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: jooweshkenhiminaaning
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: jooweshkenhimiwaaan
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: jooweshkenhimiwaaag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: jooweshkenhimiwaaing
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: jooweshkenhiminian
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: jooweshkenhiminiag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: jooweshkenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: jooweshkensimibanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: jooweshkensimibanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: jooweshkensimibaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkensim***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkensim***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkensim***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: jooweshkenhimibanan
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: jooweshkenhimibanag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: jooweshkenhimibaning
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkenhim***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkenhim***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: jooweshkensishinaaniban
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: jooweshkensishinaan***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: jooweshkensishiwaaiban
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: jooweshkensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: jooweshkensishiniiban
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: jooweshkensishini***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: jooweshkenhishinaaniban
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: jooweshkenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: jooweshkenhishiwaaiban
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: jooweshkenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: jooweshkenhishiniiban
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: jooweshkenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: jooweshkensishinaanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: jooweshkensishinaanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: jooweshkensishinaaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: jooweshkensishiwaaan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: jooweshkensishiwaaag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: jooweshkensishiwaaing
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: jooweshkensishinian
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: jooweshkensishiniag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: jooweshkensishiniing
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: jooweshkenhishinaanan
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: jooweshkenhishinaanag
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: jooweshkenhishinaaning
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: jooweshkenhishiwaaan
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: jooweshkenhishiwaaag
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: jooweshkenhishiwaaing
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: jooweshkenhishinian
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: jooweshkenhishiniag
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: jooweshkenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: jooweshkensishibanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: jooweshkensishibanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: jooweshkensishibaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkensish***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkensish***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkensish***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: jooweshkenhishibanan
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: jooweshkenhishibanag
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: jooweshkenhishibaning
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkenhish***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkenhish***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkensinaanibanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkensinaanibanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkensinaanibaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkensinaan***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkensiwaaibanan
     jooweshk+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkensiwaaibanag
     jooweshk+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkensiwaaibaning
     jooweshk+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: jooweshkensiniibanan
     jooweshk+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: jooweshkensiniibanag
     jooweshk+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: jooweshkensiniibaning
     jooweshk+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkensini***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkensini***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkensini***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkenhinaanibanan
     jooweshk+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkenhinaanibanag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkenhinaanibaning
     jooweshk+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkenhiwaaibanan
     jooweshk+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkenhiwaaibanag
     jooweshk+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkenhiwaaibaning
     jooweshk+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: jooweshkenhiniibanan
     jooweshk+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: jooweshkenhiniibanag
     jooweshk+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: jooweshkenhiniibaning
     jooweshk+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkenhini***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkenhini***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: jooweshkimishinaaniban
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: jooweshkimishinaan***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: jooweshkimishiwaaiban
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: jooweshkimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: jooweshkimishiniiban
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: jooweshkimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: jooweshkimishinaanan
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: jooweshkimishinaanag
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: jooweshkimishinaaning
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: jooweshkimishiwaaan
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: jooweshkimishiwaaag
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: jooweshkimishiwaaing
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: jooweshkimishinian
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: jooweshkimishiniag
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: jooweshkimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: jooweshkimishibanan
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: jooweshkimishibanag
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: jooweshkimishibaning
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkimish***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkimish***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     jooweshk+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkiminaanibanan
     jooweshk+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkiminaanibanag
     jooweshk+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkiminaanibaning
     jooweshk+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkiminaan***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkimiwaaibanan
     jooweshk+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkimiwaaibanag
     jooweshk+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkimiwaaibaning
     jooweshk+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: jooweshkiminiibanan
     jooweshk+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: jooweshkiminiibanag
     jooweshk+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: jooweshkiminiibaning
     jooweshk+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkimini***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkimini***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkishinaanibanan
     jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkishinaanibanag
     jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkishinaanibaning
     jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***an
